src/fst/orthography/Cyrl-to-Latn.xfscript
! Script for Cyrillic to Latin for Erzya

define BäComposeRule [ Б я ] -> [ B ä ] ;
define BaComposeRule [ Б а ] -> [ B a ] ;
define BiComposeRule [ Б и ] -> [ B i ] ;
define ByComposeRule [ Б ы ] -> [ B y ] ;
define BüComposeRule [ Б ю ] -> [ B ü ] ;
define BuComposeRule [ Б у ] -> [ B u ] ;
define BeComposeRule [ Б е ] -> [ B e ] ;
define BěComposeRule [ Б э ] -> [ B ě ] ;
define BöComposeRule [ Б ё ] -> [ B ö ] ;
define BoComposeRule [ Б о ] -> [ B o ] ;

define VäComposeRule [ В я ] -> [ V ä ] ;
define VaComposeRule [ В а ] -> [ V a ] ;
define ViComposeRule [ В и ] -> [ V i ] ;
define VyComposeRule [ В ы ] -> [ V y ] ;
define VüComposeRule [ В ю ] -> [ V ü ] ;
define VuComposeRule [ В у ] -> [ V u ] ;
define VeComposeRule [ В е ] -> [ V e ] ;
define VěComposeRule [ В э ] -> [ V ě ] ;
define VöComposeRule [ В ё ] -> [ V ö ] ;
define VoComposeRule [ В о ] -> [ V o ] ;

define GäComposeRule [ Г я ] -> [ G ä ] ;
define GaComposeRule [ Г а ] -> [ G a ] ;
define GiComposeRule [ Г и ] -> [ G i ] ;
define GyComposeRule [ Г ы ] -> [ G y ] ;
define GüComposeRule [ Г ю ] -> [ G ü ] ;
define GuComposeRule [ Г у ] -> [ G u ] ;
define GeComposeRule [ Г е ] -> [ G e ] ;
define GěComposeRule [ Г э ] -> [ G ě ] ;
define GöComposeRule [ Г ё ] -> [ G ö ] ;
define GoComposeRule [ Г о ] -> [ G o ] ;

define DäComposeRule [ Д я ] -> [ D ä ] ;
define DaComposeRule [ Д а ] -> [ D a ] ;
define DiComposeRule [ Д и ] -> [ D i ] ;
define DyComposeRule [ Д ы ] -> [ D y ] ;
define DüComposeRule [ Д ю ] -> [ D ü ] ;
define DuComposeRule [ Д у ] -> [ D u ] ;
define DeComposeRule [ Д е ] -> [ D e ] ;
define DěComposeRule [ Д э ] -> [ D ě ] ;
define DöComposeRule [ Д ё ] -> [ D ö ] ;
define DoComposeRule [ Д о ] -> [ D o ] ;
define DʹComposeRule [ Д ь ] -> [ D́ ] ;

define ŽäComposeRule [ Ж я ] -> [ Ž ä ] ;
define ŽaComposeRule [ Ж а ] -> [ Ž a ] ;
define ŽiComposeRule [ Ж и ] -> [ Ž i ] ;
define ŽyComposeRule [ Ж ы ] -> [ Ž y ] ;
define ŽüComposeRule [ Ж ю ] -> [ Ž ü ] ;
define ŽuComposeRule [ Ж у ] -> [ Ž u ] ;
define ŽeComposeRule [ Ж е ] -> [ Ž e ] ;
define ŽěComposeRule [ Ж э ] -> [ Ž ě ] ;
define ŽöComposeRule [ Ж ё ] -> [ Ž ö ] ;
define ŽoComposeRule [ Ж о ] -> [ Ž o ] ;

define ZäComposeRule [ З я ] -> [ Z ä ] ;
define ZaComposeRule [ З а ] -> [ Z a ] ;
define ZiComposeRule [ З и ] -> [ Z i ] ;
define ZyComposeRule [ З ы ] -> [ Z y ] ;
define ZüComposeRule [ З ю ] -> [ Z ü ] ;
define ZuComposeRule [ З у ] -> [ Z u ] ;
define ZeComposeRule [ З е ] -> [ Z e ] ;
define ZěComposeRule [ З э ] -> [ Z ě ] ;
define ZöComposeRule [ З ё ] -> [ Z ö ] ;
define ZoComposeRule [ З о ] -> [ Z o ] ;
define ŹComposeRule [ З ь ] -> [ Ź ] ;

define JäComposeRule [ Й я ] -> [ J ä ] ;
define JaComposeRule [ Й а ] -> [ J a ] ;
define JiComposeRule [ Й и ] -> [ J i ] ;
define JyComposeRule [ Й ы ] -> [ J y ] ;
define JüComposeRule [ Й ю ] -> [ J ü ] ;
define JuComposeRule [ Й у ] -> [ J u ] ;
define JeComposeRule [ Й е ] -> [ J e ] ;
define JěComposeRule [ Й э ] -> [ J ě ] ;
define JöComposeRule [ Й ё ] -> [ J ö ] ;
define JoComposeRule [ Й о ] -> [ J o ] ;

define KäComposeRule [ К я ] -> [ K ä ] ;
define KaComposeRule [ К а ] -> [ K a ] ;
define KiComposeRule [ К и ] -> [ K i ] ;
define KyComposeRule [ К ы ] -> [ K y ] ;
define KüComposeRule [ К ю ] -> [ K ü ] ;
define KuComposeRule [ К у ] -> [ K u ] ;
define KeComposeRule [ К е ] -> [ K e ] ;
define KěComposeRule [ К э ] -> [ K ě ] ;
define KöComposeRule [ К ё ] -> [ K ö ] ;
define KoComposeRule [ К о ] -> [ K o ] ;

define LäComposeRule [ Л я ] -> [ L ä ] ;
define LaComposeRule [ Л а ] -> [ L a ] ;
define LiComposeRule [ Л и ] -> [ L i ] ;
define LyComposeRule [ Л ы ] -> [ L y ] ;
define LüComposeRule [ Л ю ] -> [ L ü ] ;
define LuComposeRule [ Л у ] -> [ L u ] ;
define LeComposeRule [ Л е ] -> [ L e ] ;
define LěComposeRule [ Л э ] -> [ L ě ] ;
define LöComposeRule [ Л ё ] -> [ L ö ] ;
define LoComposeRule [ Л о ] -> [ L o ] ;
define ĹComposeRule [ Л ь ] -> [ Ĺ ] ;

define MäComposeRule [ М я ] -> [ M ä ] ;
define MaComposeRule [ М а ] -> [ M a ] ;
define MiComposeRule [ М и ] -> [ M i ] ;
define MyComposeRule [ М ы ] -> [ M y ] ;
define MüComposeRule [ М ю ] -> [ M ü ] ;
define MuComposeRule [ М у ] -> [ M u ] ;
define MeComposeRule [ М е ] -> [ M e ] ;
define MěComposeRule [ М э ] -> [ M ě ] ;
define MöComposeRule [ М ё ] -> [ M ö ] ;
define MoComposeRule [ М о ] -> [ M o ] ;

define NäComposeRule [ Н я ] -> [ N ä ] ;
define NaComposeRule [ Н а ] -> [ N a ] ;
define NiComposeRule [ Н и ] -> [ N i ] ;
define NyComposeRule [ Н ы ] -> [ N y ] ;
define NüComposeRule [ Н ю ] -> [ N ü ] ;
define NuComposeRule [ Н у ] -> [ N u ] ;
define NeComposeRule [ Н е ] -> [ N e ] ;
define NěComposeRule [ Н э ] -> [ N ě ] ;
define NöComposeRule [ Н ё ] -> [ N ö ] ;
define NoComposeRule [ Н о ] -> [ N o ] ;
define ŃComposeRule [ Н ь ] -> [ Ń ] ;

define PäComposeRule [ П я ] -> [ P ä ] ;
define PaComposeRule [ П а ] -> [ P a ] ;
define PiComposeRule [ П и ] -> [ P i ] ;
define PyComposeRule [ П ы ] -> [ P y ] ;
define PüComposeRule [ П ю ] -> [ P ü ] ;
define PuComposeRule [ П у ] -> [ P u ] ;
define PeComposeRule [ П е ] -> [ P e ] ;
define PěComposeRule [ П э ] -> [ P ě ] ;
define PöComposeRule [ П ё ] -> [ P ö ] ;
define PoComposeRule [ П о ] -> [ P o ] ;

define RäComposeRule [ Р я ] -> [ R ä ] ;
define RaComposeRule [ Р а ] -> [ R a ] ;
define RiComposeRule [ Р и ] -> [ R i ] ;
define RyComposeRule [ Р ы ] -> [ R y ] ;
define RüComposeRule [ Р ю ] -> [ R ü ] ;
define RuComposeRule [ Р у ] -> [ R u ] ;
define ReComposeRule [ Р е ] -> [ R e ] ;
define RěComposeRule [ Р э ] -> [ R ě ] ;
define RöComposeRule [ Р ё ] -> [ R ö ] ;
define RoComposeRule [ Р о ] -> [ R o ] ;
define ŔComposeRule [ Р ь ] -> [ Ŕ ] ;

define SäComposeRule [ С я ] -> [ S ä ] ;
define SaComposeRule [ С а ] -> [ S a ] ;
define SiComposeRule [ С и ] -> [ S i ] ;
define SyComposeRule [ С ы ] -> [ S y ] ;
define SüComposeRule [ С ю ] -> [ S ü ] ;
define SuComposeRule [ С у ] -> [ S u ] ;
define SeComposeRule [ С е ] -> [ S e ] ;
define SěComposeRule [ С э ] -> [ S ě ] ;
define SöComposeRule [ С ё ] -> [ S ö ] ;
define SoComposeRule [ С о ] -> [ S o ] ;
define ŚComposeRule [ С ь ] -> [ Ś ] ;

define TäComposeRule [ Т я ] -> [ T ä ] ;
define TaComposeRule [ Т а ] -> [ T a ] ;
define TiComposeRule [ Т и ] -> [ T i ] ;
define TyComposeRule [ Т ы ] -> [ T y ] ;
define TüComposeRule [ Т ю ] -> [ T ü ] ;
define TuComposeRule [ Т у ] -> [ T u ] ;
define TeComposeRule [ Т е ] -> [ T e ] ;
define TěComposeRule [ Т э ] -> [ T ě ] ;
define TöComposeRule [ Т ё ] -> [ T ö ] ;
define ToComposeRule [ Т о ] -> [ T o ] ;
define TʹComposeRule [ Т ь ] -> [ T́ ] ;

define FäComposeRule [ Ф я ] -> [ F ä ] ;
define FaComposeRule [ Ф а ] -> [ F a ] ;
define FiComposeRule [ Ф и ] -> [ F i ] ;
define FyComposeRule [ Ф ы ] -> [ F y ] ;
define FüComposeRule [ Ф ю ] -> [ F ü ] ;
define FuComposeRule [ Ф у ] -> [ F u ] ;
define FeComposeRule [ Ф е ] -> [ F e ] ;
define FěComposeRule [ Ф э ] -> [ F ě ] ;
define FöComposeRule [ Ф ё ] -> [ F ö ] ;
define FoComposeRule [ Ф о ] -> [ F o ] ;

define XäComposeRule [ Х я ] -> [ X ä ] ;
define XaComposeRule [ Х а ] -> [ X a ] ;
define XiComposeRule [ Х и ] -> [ X i ] ;
define XyComposeRule [ Х ы ] -> [ X y ] ;
define XüComposeRule [ Х ю ] -> [ X ü ] ;
define XuComposeRule [ Х у ] -> [ X u ] ;
define XeComposeRule [ Х е ] -> [ X e ] ;
define XěComposeRule [ Х э ] -> [ X ě ] ;
define XöComposeRule [ Х ё ] -> [ X ö ] ;
define XoComposeRule [ Х о ] -> [ X o ] ;

define CäComposeRule [ Ц я ] -> [ C ä ] ;
define CaComposeRule [ Ц а ] -> [ C a ] ;
define CiComposeRule [ Ц и ] -> [ C i ] ;
define CyComposeRule [ Ц ы ] -> [ C y ] ;
define CüComposeRule [ Ц ю ] -> [ C ü ] ;
define CuComposeRule [ Ц у ] -> [ C u ] ;
define CeComposeRule [ Ц е ] -> [ C e ] ;
define CěComposeRule [ Ц э ] -> [ C ě ] ;
define CöComposeRule [ Ц ё ] -> [ C ö ] ;
define CoComposeRule [ Ц о ] -> [ C o ] ;
define ĆComposeRule [ Ц ь ] -> [ Ć ] ;

define ČäComposeRule [ Ч я ] -> [ Č ä ] ;
define ČaComposeRule [ Ч а ] -> [ Č a ] ;
define ČiComposeRule [ Ч и ] -> [ Č i ] ;
define ČyComposeRule [ Ч ы ] -> [ Č y ] ;
define ČüComposeRule [ Ч ю ] -> [ Č ü ] ;
define ČuComposeRule [ Ч у ] -> [ Č u ] ;
define ČeComposeRule [ Ч е ] -> [ Č e ] ;
define ČěComposeRule [ Ч э ] -> [ Č ě ] ;
define ČöComposeRule [ Ч ё ] -> [ Č ö ] ;
define ČoComposeRule [ Ч о ] -> [ Č o ] ;

define ŠäComposeRule [ Ш я ] -> [ Š ä ] ;
define ŠaComposeRule [ Ш а ] -> [ Š a ] ;
define ŠiComposeRule [ Ш и ] -> [ Š i ] ;
define ŠyComposeRule [ Ш ы ] -> [ Š y ] ;
define ŠüComposeRule [ Ш ю ] -> [ Š ü ] ;
define ŠuComposeRule [ Ш у ] -> [ Š u ] ;
define ŠeComposeRule [ Ш е ] -> [ Š e ] ;
define ŠěComposeRule [ Ш э ] -> [ Š ě ] ;
define ŠöComposeRule [ Ш ё ] -> [ Š ö ] ;
define ŠoComposeRule [ Ш о ] -> [ Š o ] ;

define ŜäComposeRule [ Щ я ] -> [ Ŝ ä ] ;
define ŜaComposeRule [ Щ а ] -> [ Ŝ a ] ;
define ŜiComposeRule [ Щ и ] -> [ Ŝ i ] ;
define ŜyComposeRule [ Щ ы ] -> [ Ŝ y ] ;
define ŜüComposeRule [ Щ ю ] -> [ Ŝ ü ] ;
define ŜuComposeRule [ Щ у ] -> [ Ŝ u ] ;
define ŜeComposeRule [ Щ е ] -> [ Ŝ e ] ;
define ŜěComposeRule [ Щ э ] -> [ Ŝ ě ] ;
define ŜöComposeRule [ Щ ё ] -> [ Ŝ ö ] ;
define ŜoComposeRule [ Щ о ] -> [ Ŝ o ] ;

! Word-initial

define JaComposeRule [ .#. Я ] -> [ .#. J a ] ;
define JoComposeRule [ .#. Ё ] -> [ .#. J o ] ;
define JuComposeRule [ .#. Ю ] -> [ .#. J u ] ;

! After vowel

define ÄjaComposeRule [ Я я ] -> [ Ä J A ] ;
define AjaComposeRule [ А я ] -> [ A J A ] ;
define ÖjaComposeRule [ Ё я ] -> [ Ö J A ] ;
define OjaComposeRule [ О я ] -> [ O j a ] ;
define ÜjaComposeRule [ Ю я ] -> [ Ü j a ] ;
define UjaComposeRule [ У я ] -> [ U j a ] ;
define EjaComposeRule [ Е я ] -> [ E j a ] ;
define ĚjaComposeRule [ Э я ] -> [ Ě j a ] ;
define IjaComposeRule [ И я ] -> [ I j a ] ;
define YjaComposeRule [ Ы я ] -> [ Y j a ] ;

define ÄjoComposeRule [ Я ё ] -> [ Ä j o ] ;
define AjoComposeRule [ А ё ] -> [ A j o ] ;
define ÖjoComposeRule [ Ё ё ] -> [ Ö j o ] ;
define OjoComposeRule [ О ё ] -> [ O j o ] ;
define ÜjoComposeRule [ Ю ё ] -> [ Ü j o ] ;
define UjoComposeRule [ У ё ] -> [ U j o ] ;
define EjoComposeRule [ Е ё ] -> [ E j o ] ;
define ĚjoComposeRule [ Э ё ] -> [ Ě j o ] ;
define IjoComposeRule [ И ё ] -> [ I j o ] ;
define YjoComposeRule [ Ы ё ] -> [ Y j o ] ;

define ÄjuComposeRule [ Я ю ] -> [ Ä j u ] ;
define AjuComposeRule [ А ю ] -> [ A j u ] ;
define ÖjuComposeRule [ Ё ю ] -> [ Ö j u ] ;
define OjuComposeRule [ О ю ] -> [ O j u ] ;
define ÜjuComposeRule [ Ю ю ] -> [ Ü j u ] ;
define UjuComposeRule [ У ю ] -> [ U j u ] ;
define EjuComposeRule [ Е ю ] -> [ E j u ] ;
define ĚjuComposeRule [ Э ю ] -> [ Ě j u ] ;
define IjuComposeRule [ И ю ] -> [ I j u ] ;
define YjuComposeRule [ Ы ю ] -> [ Y j u ] ;

! single letters

define ARule [ А ] -> [ A ] ;
define BRule [ Б ] -> [ B ] ;
define VRule [ В ] -> [ V ] ;
define GRule [ Г ] -> [ G ] ;
define DRule [ Д ] -> [ D ] ;
define ERule [ Е ] -> [ E ] ;
define ÖRule [ Ё ] -> [ Ö ] ;
define ŽRule [ Ж ] -> [ Ž ] ;
define ZRule [ З ] -> [ Z ] ;
define IRule [ И ] -> [ I ] ;
define JRule [ Й ] -> [ J ] ;
define KRule [ К ] -> [ K ] ;
define LRule [ Л ] -> [ L ] ;
define MRule [ М ] -> [ M ] ;
define NRule [ Н ] -> [ N ] ;
define ORule [ О ] -> [ O ] ;
define PRule [ П ] -> [ P ] ;
define RRule [ Р ] -> [ R ] ;
define SRule [ С ] -> [ S ] ;
define TRule [ Т ] -> [ T ] ;
define URule [ У ] -> [ U ] ;
define FRule [ Ф ] -> [ F ] ;
define XRule [ Х ] -> [ X ] ;
define CRule [ Ц ] -> [ C ] ;
define ČRule [ Ч ] -> [ Č ] ;
define ŠRule [ Ш ] -> [ Š ] ;
define ŜRule [ Щ ] -> [ Ŝ ] ;
define YRule [ Ы ] -> [ Y ] ;
define ĚRule [ Э ] -> [ Ě ] ;
define ÜRule [ Ю ] -> [ Ü ] ;
define ÄRule [ Я ] -> [ Ä ] ;

! lower-case letters
